Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF554.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2557SV (2) 91 dg/ko S.F. 554 Section 1. Section 232.2, subsection 12, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. (1) All rights and duties of a custodian shall be 3 subject to any residual rights and duties remaining in a parent 4 or guardian. 5 (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), the department may 6 consent to emergency medical care and routine medical care for 7 a child that will allow the child to experience childhood and 8 participate in activities in a manner similar to the childâs 9 peers. âRoutine medical careâ includes but is not limited to 10 all of the following: 11 (a) Preventative care, also known as wellness care, not 12 including the administration of a vaccination. 13 (b) Nonemergency medical care including but not limited 14 to a physical examination, a diagnostic laboratory test, or a 15 medical visit for a minor illness. 16 (c) Use of necessary medication, including but not limited 17 to antibiotics. 18 (3) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), the department 19 may consent to a childâs participation in an individualized 20 education program. 21 Sec. 2. Section 232.2, subsection 12, Code 2025, is amended 22 by adding the following new paragraph: 23 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. If a court order entered under this 24 chapter transfers legal custody of a child to the department, 25 the department shall have the authority to delegate the 26 departmentâs rights and duties as custodian of the child to a 27 licensee under chapter 237. 28 Sec. 3. Section 237.10, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 29 by adding the following new paragraph: 30 NEW PARAGRAPH . d. (1) The department shall notify an 31 individual licensee, and the parents or guardians of a child, 32 if the department delegates the departmentâs right to consent 33 to emergency medical care and routine medical care on behalf of 34 the child under section 232.2, paragraph âcâ , to the individual 35 -1- LSB 2557SV (2) 91 dg/ko 1/ 3 S.F. 554 licensee. 1 (2) The department shall notify the department of 2 education, an individual licensee, and the parents or guardians 3 of a child if the department delegates the departmentâs right 4 to consent to participation in an individualized education 5 program on behalf of the child under section 232.2, paragraph 6 âcâ , to the individual licensee. 7